tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Golf > Golf Antrenman Yardımcıları: Golf hizalama çubukları; Golf tutuş çalıştırıcıları; Golf vuruş matları; Golf vuruş torbaları; Golf lazerli hizalama yardımcıları; Golf antrenman fileleri; Golf Vuruşu Daması; Golf Vuruş Matları; Golf Vuruş Ortakları; Golf putting simülatörleri ve dijital çalıştırıcılar; Golf Vuruş Eğitmenleri
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 高爾夫球 > 高爾夫球訓練輔助器材: 高爾夫瞄準桿; 高爾夫握桿訓練器; 高爾夫打擊墊; 高爾夫擊球袋; 高爾夫雷射瞄準輔助器; 高爾夫練習網; 高爾夫球推桿訓練; 高爾夫球推桿墊; 高爾夫推桿輔助; 高爾夫推桿模擬器與數位訓練器; 高爾夫揮桿訓練器
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Golfe > Equipamentos de treino para golfe: Varas de alinhamento de golfe; Dispositivos de treino de pega de golfe; Tapetes de treino de golfe; Sacos de impacto de golfe; Acessórios a laser de alinhamento de golfe; Redes de treino de golfe; Checkers de prática para golfe; Tapetes de prática para golfe; Parceiros de prática para golfe; Simuladores e dispositivos de treino digital de putting; Artigos de treino de tacada para golfe
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กอล์ฟ > อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมกอล์ฟ: ไม้เล็งทิศทางกอล์ฟ; อุปกรณ์ฝึกจับกริปกอล์ฟ; พรมซ้อมตีกอล์ฟ; ถุงอิมแพ็คกอล์ฟ; อุปกรณ์เลเซอร์เล็งทิศทางกอล์ฟ; ตาข่ายซ้อมตีกอล์ฟ; ไม้เช็คการพัตลูกกอล์ฟ; เสื่อรองพัตลูกกอล์ฟ; เครื่องช่วยพัตลงหลุม; เครื่องจำลองการพัตต์และอุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมกอล์ฟดิจิทัล; ตัวช่วยสวิงกอล์ฟ
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Golf > Golfové tréningové pomôcky: Zarovnávacie tyče na golf; Trenažéry na golfové úchopy; Golfové odpalové podložky; Vaky na nácvik golfového švihu; Pomôcky na laserové zarovnávanie pri golfe; Tréningové siete na golf; Golfové patovacie zameriavače; Golfové patovacie podložky; Golfové trenažéry patovania; Golfové puttingové simulátory a digitálne trenažéry; Golfové trenažéry švihu
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Golf > Material de aprendizaje de golf: Varas de alineación de golf; Entrenadores de agarre de golf; Alfombras de práctica de golf; Bolsas de impacto de golf; Ayudas de alineación láser de golf; Redes de práctica de golf; Damas de putt de golf; Alfombrillas para golf; Compañeros de putt de golf; Simuladores de putt y entrenadores digitales de golf; Monitores de swing de golf
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Golf > Golfové tréninkové pomůcky: Golfové směrové tyče; Pomůcky pro nácvik golfového úchopu; Golfové odpalovací podložky; Golfové úderové pytle; Laserové pomůcky pro nácvik směru; Golfové tréninkové sítě; Patování – kontrolní pomůcky pro golf; Patování – patovací koberce/podložky pro golf; Patování – „putting partner“; Golfové patovací simulátory a digitální trenažéry; Trenažéry golfového švihu
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Golf > Golf-Trainingshilfen: Golf-Ausrichtungsstäbe; Golf-Griff-Trainer; Golf-Abschlagmatten; Golf-Impact-Bags; Golf-Laser-Ausrichtungshilfen; Golf-Übungsnetze; Golf-Putt-Checker; Golf-Putting-Matten; Golf-Putting-Partner; Golf-Putting-Simulatoren & Digitale Trainer; Golfschwungtrainer
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Golf > Golf Training Aids: Golf Alignment Sticks; Golf Grip Trainers; Golf Hitting Mats; Golf Impact Bags; Golf Laser Alignment Aids; Golf Practice Nets; Golf Putt Checkers; Golf Putting Mats; Golf Putting Partners; Golf Putting Simulators & Digital Trainers; Golf Swing Trainers
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Golf > Pomagala za vježbanje golfa: Štapovi za poravnavanje za golf; Trenažeri za držanje za golf; Podloge za udaranje za golf; Vreće za udaranje za golf; Pomagala za lasersko poravnavanje za golf; Mreže za vježbanje za golf; Kontroleri za loptice; Podloge za golf; Pomoćna kutija za ubačaj golf loptica; Simulatori i digitalni trenažeri za putting za golf; Tenažeri za golf
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 高尔夫用品 > 高尔夫训练辅助设备: 高尔夫方向指示棒; 高尔夫握杆练习器; 高尔夫打击垫; 高尔夫击球练习袋; 高尔夫激光定位辅助工具; 高尔夫练习网; 高尔夫推杆检查器; 高尔夫推杆垫; 高尔夫推杆辅助器; 高尔夫推杆模拟器与数字训练器; 高尔夫挥杆训练器
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Golf > Acessórios de treinamento de golfe: Bastões de alinhamento de golfe; Treinadores de grip de golfe; Tapetes de treino de golfe; Bolsas de impacto de golfe; Acessórios de alinhamento a laser para golfe; Redes de treino de golfe; Réguas de putt de golfe; Tapetes para treino de golfe; Treinadores de putt de golfe; Simuladores de putting e treinadores digitais de golfe; Treinadores de swing de golfe
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Golf > Träningshjälpmedel för golf: Siktpinnar för golf; Grepptränare för golf; Slagmattor för golf; Slagsäckar för golf; Lasersikthjälpmedel för golf; Övningsnät för golf; Golfputtkontrollörer; Golfputtmattor; Golfputtningspartner; Puttingsimulatorer och digitala träningsredskap för golf; Golfswingtränare
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ゴルフ > ゴルフ練習器具: ゴルフアライメントスティック; ゴルフグリップトレーナー; ゴルフショットマット; ゴルフインパクトバッグ; ゴルフレーザーアライメント補助具; ゴルフ練習ネット; ゴルフパットチェッカー; ゴルフパッティングマット; ゴルフパッティングパートナー; パッティングシミュレーター＆デジタルトレーナー; ゴルフスイングトレーナー
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 골프 > 골프용 훈련 장비: 골프 얼라인먼트 스틱; 골프 그립 트레이너; 골프 타격 매트; 골프 임팩트 백; 골프 레이저 얼라인먼트 보조 기구; 골프 연습용 네트; 골프 퍼트 체커; 골프 퍼팅 연습 매트; 골프 퍼팅 파트너; 골프 퍼팅 시뮬레이터 및 디지털 트레이너; 골프 스윙 트레이너
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Golf > Artykuły treningowe do golfa: Kijki kierunkowe do golfa; Trenażery chwytu golfowego; Maty treningowe do golfa; Worki uderzeniowe do golfa; Laserowe wskaźniki kierunku do golfa; Siatki treningowe do golfa; Mierniki siły uderzenia; Maty do gry w golfa; Partnerzy do gry w golfa; Symulatory i trenażery cyfrowe do puttingu; Trenażery zamachu golfowego
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Голф > Помощни средства за обучение по голф: Пръчки за подравняване за голф; Тренажори за захват за голф; Тренировъчни постелки за голф удари; Тренировъчни торби за голф удари; Помощни средства за лазерно подравняване на голф; Тренировъчни мрежи за голф; Линийки за практикуване на прави удари; Подложки за линийки за практикуване на прави удари; Уреди за връщане на топка; Симулатори за голф и дигитални тренажори; Тренажори за тренировка на замах
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Gôn > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập chơi gôn: Gậy căn chỉnh tư thế golf; Phụ kiện tập cầm gậy golf; Thảm tập đánh golf; Túi đập tập golf; Thiết bị laser căn chỉnh tư thế golf; Lưới tập golf; Thước theo dõi đường putt; Thảm tập putting; Bộ sản phẩm tập putting; Máy mô phỏng tập gạt & máy tập golf kỹ thuật số; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập swing
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Golf > Golfin harjoitusvälineet: Golfin suuntauskepit; Golfin oteharjoitteluvälineet; Golfin lyöntimatot; Golfin lyöntisäkit; Golfin lasersuuntauslaitteet; Golfin harjoitusverkot; Golfin suuntaustikut; Golfin puttimatot; Golfin puttiavustajat; Puttisimulaattorit ja digitaaliset harjoituslaitteet; Golfin svingiharjoitteluvälineet
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Golf > Golf edzési segédeszközök: Golf beállító pálcák; Golf markolat-gyakorlók; Golf ütőszőnyegek; Golf ütőzsákok; Golf lézeres beállítás-segítők; Golf gyakorlóhálók; Golf-putterellenőrző; Golf-putterszőnyegek; Golf-putterpartnerek; Golf puttoló szimulátorok és digitális edzőgépek; Golflendítésedző
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Golf > Hjælpemidler til golftræning: Alignment sticks til golf; Grip-trænere til golf; Slåmåtter til golf; Impact bags til golf; Laser-alignment-udstyr til golf; Træningsnet til golf; Hjælpemidler til put; Golfputtemåtter; Golfputtepartnere; Puttesimulatorer og digitale trænere; Golfsvingtrænere
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Golf > Treningsutstyr for golf: Siktestikker for golf; Grip-trenere for golf; Slagmatter for golf; Slagposer for golf; Lasersiktemidler for golf; Treningsnett for golf; Golfputter-sjekkere; Golfputtematter; Golfputtepartnere; Puttesimulatorer og digitale trenere for golf; Golfsvingtrenere
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Golf > Pripomočki za vadbo golfa: Golf palice za poravnavo; Vadbeni pripomočki za oprijem pri golfu; Podloge za vadbo golfa; Torbe za udarce v golfu; Laserski pripomočki za poravnavo; Vadbene mreže za golf; Naprave za preverjanje natančnosti pri patanju; Podloge za vadbo patanja; Naprave za izboljšanje tehnike patanja; Simulatorji in digitalni trenažerji za putting udarce; Pripomočki za vadbo zamaha za golf
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гольф > Тренировочный инвентарь для гольфа: Направляющие палочки для гольфа; Тренажеры для хвата клюшки; Тренировочные маты для гольфа; Ударные мешки для гольфа; Лазерные направляющие для гольфа; Тренировочные сетки для гольфа; Линейки для отработки патта; Дорожки для отработки патта; Машинки для возврата мячей; Симуляторы и цифровые тренажеры для паттинга; Тренажеры для отработки свинга
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Golf > Articole pentru antrenamente de golf: Tije pentru aliniere golf; Dispozitive de antrenament pentru priza la golf; Covorașe de lovit pentru golf; Saci de impact pentru golf; Dispozitive cu laser pentru aliniere golf; Plase pentru antrenament de golf; Ghidaj pentru lovituri put pentru golf; Covorașe pentru lovituri put pentru golf; Parteneri pentru lovituri put pentru golf; Simulatoare și sisteme digitale de antrenament pentru putting; Articole pentru antrenament lovituri swing pentru golf
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Golf > Benodigdheden voor golftraining: Golf-alignmentsticks; Golfgriptrainers; Golfafslagmatten; Golf-impactbags; Laser-alignmenthulpmiddelen voor golf; Golfoefennetten; Golfputtcheckers; Golfputtmatten; Golfputtpartners; Golfputtingsimulators en digitale trainers; Golfswingtrainers
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Γκολφ > Βοηθήματα προπόνησης γκολφ: Ράβδοι ευθυγράμμισης γκολφ; Βοηθήματα εκπαίδευσης λαβής γκολφ; Ταπέτα χτυπημάτων γκολφ; Σάκοι πρόσκρουσης γκολφ; Βοηθήματα ευθυγράμμισης λέιζερ γκολφ; Δίχτυα προπόνησης γκολφ; Ελεγκτές χτυπήματος γκολφ; Χαλάκια χτυπήματος γκολφ; Συνεργάτες εξάσκησης χτυπήματος γκολφ; Προσομοιωτές putting και ψηφιακά βοηθήματα εκπαίδευσης γκολφ; Προπονητές κίνησης γκολφ
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Golf > Outils d’entraînement pour le golf: Baguettes d’alignement de golf; Entraîneurs de grip de golf; Tapis de frappe de golf; Sacs d’impact de golf; Aides d’alignement laser pour le golf; Filets de pratique de golf; Vérificateurs de putt de golf; Tapis de putt de golf; Partenaires de putt de golf; Simulateurs de putting et entraîneurs numériques de golf; Entraînement au swing de golf
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Golf > Attrezzatura allenamento golf: Aste di allineamento da golf; Strumenti di allenamento per l'impugnatura da golf; Tappetini da allenamento da golf; Sacche da impatto da golf; Strumenti laser di allineamento da golf; Reti da allenamento da golf; Dama del putt da golf; Tappetini da golf; Partner per il putting del golf; Simulatori e strumenti digitali di allenamento per putter; Istruttori di swing da golf
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Golfas > Golfo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Golfo lygiavimo lazdos; Golfo rankenos treniruokliai; Golfo smūgiavimo kilimėliai; Golfo smūgiavimo krepšiai; Golfo lazerinės lygiavimo priemonės; Golfo treniruočių tinklai; Golfo mušimo patikros liniuotės; Golfo mušimo kilimėliai; Golfo kamuoliukų grąžinimo įtaisas; Golfo ridenimo simuliatoriai ir skaitmeniniai treniruokliai; Golfo smūgio treniruokliai